Louisiana, session 2026, HB1202.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2502 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2502. Metering devices; pumpage fees
Any parish with a population of not less than nineteen thousand and not more
than nineteen thousand six hundred according to the latest federal decennial census
shall be subject to the following provisions:
(1) Clamp-on ultrasonic flowmeters may be removed.
(2) Pumpage fees shall not exceed forty dollars for every million gallons
pumped.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
redesignate the part heading of R.S. 38:2501, "PART I. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE
LOUISIANA WILDLIFE AND FISHERIES COMMISSION" as "PART I. GENERAL".
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2255 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1202